en: Plain whole fermented milk drink
fr: Lait fermenté à boire nature au lait entier

en: Plain fermented skimmed milk drink
fr: Lait fermenté à boire nature maigre

en: Flavoured yogurt drinks with sugar, Flavoured drinkable yogurts with sugar, Flavoured dairy drinks with sugar, Flavoured fermented milks with sugar
fr: Yaourts à boire aromatisés sucrés, Boissons lactées aromatisées sucrées au lait fermenté, Laits fermentés aromatisés sucrés

en: Fermented milk drinks with fruits, Dairy drinks with sugar and fruits, Fermented milks with sugar and fruits
fr: Boissons lactées fermentées aux fruits, Boisson lactée sucrée au lait fermenté et aux fruits, Lait fermenté sucré aux fruits
hr: Fermentirani mliječni napici s voćem
nl: Yoghurtdranken met fruit en suiker

en: Plain fermented milk drinks with sugar, Plain dairy drinks with sugar, Plain fermented milks with sugar
fr: Boissons lactées fermentées sucrées nature, Boissons lactées nature sucrées au lait fermenté, Laits fermentés nature sucrés, laits fermentés sucrés

en: Milk drinks fermented with L casei
fr: Boissons lactées fermentées au L casei

en: Sweetened fermented milk drinks with L casei, Plain dairy drinks with sugar and L Casei, Plain fermented milks with sugar and L Casei, Plain yogurts with sugar and L Casei
fr: Boissons lactées fermentés au L casei nature sucrées, Boissons lactées nature sucrées au lait fermenté et L Casei, Yaourts à boire nature sucrés au L Casei, Laits fermentés nature sucrés au L Casei

en: Milk drinks fermented with Bifidus
fr: Boissons lactées fermentées au Bifidus

en: Kefir
xx: Kefir
bg: Кефир
de: Kefir
es: Kéfir
fi: piimä
fr: Kéfir, Képhir
hr: Kefir
hu: Kefir
it: Kefir
ja: ケフィア
lt: Kefyrai, Kefyras
nl: Kefir
pl: Kefir
ro: Kefir
ru: Кефир
sv: Kefir
tr: Kefir

en: Kefir 1 %
xx: Kefir 1 %
bg: Кефир 1 %
de: Kefir 1 %
fr: Kéfir 1 %
hr: Kefir 1%
lt: Kefyrai 1 %
ro: Kefir 1 %
ru: Кефир 1 %, Кефир 1%, Кефир 1.0 %

en: Kefir 2.5 %
xx: Kefir 2.5 %
bg: Кефир 2.5 %
de: Kefir 2.5 %
fr: Kéfir 2,5 %
hr: Kefir 2,5%
lt: Kefyrai 2,5 %
ro: Kefir 2,5 %
ru: Кефир 2.5 %, Кефир 2.5%

en: Kefir 3.2 %
xx: Kefir 3.2 %
bg: Кефир 3.2 %
de: Kefir 3.2 %
fr: Kéfir 3,2 %
hr: Kefir 3,2%
lt: Kefyrai 3,2 %
ro: Kefir 3,2 %
ru: Кефир 3.2 %, Кефир 3.2%, Кефир с массовой долей жира 3.2 %

en: Kefir cream 10%
fr: Crème Kéfir 10%

en: Kefir for children, Kefir for babies
de: Kefir für Babies
fr: Kéfir pour bébés, Kéfir pour la nourriture pour bébés
hr: Kefir za djecu
lt: Kefyrai vaikams, kefyrai kūdikiams
ro: Kefir pentru bebeluși
ru: Кефир для детского питания

en: Sana
ro: Sana

en: Doogh and ayran
de: Dugh und Ayran
fr: Ayrans et doughs
hr: Doogh i ajran
nl: Doogh en Ayran
ru: Тан и айран

en: Doogh
de: Dugh
hr: Doogh
ru: Тан

en: Ayran
bg: Айрян
de: Ayran
fr: Ayrans
hr: Ajran
nl: Ayran
ru: Айран
tr: Ayran

en: Lassi
xx: Lassi
de: Lassi
fr: Lassi
hr: Lassi
ja: ラッシー
nl: Lassi

en: Cheese preparations
fr: Spécialités fromagères, Préparations fromagères